District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1207.31

Waiver of licensure requirements — Demonstration of performance.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 730
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-205, § 2(f), 41 DCR 7712
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 7(e), 43 DCR 530
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-17, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3622

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3307.31.